Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-210.
(Repealed effective January 1, 2024) Mixed beverages licenses.

Subject to the provisions of §

4.1-124

, the Board may grant the following licenses relating to mixed beverages:

Mixed beverage restaurant licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in dining areas and other designated areas of such restaurant or off-premises consumption. Such license may be granted only to persons (i) who operate a restaurant and (ii) whose gross receipts from the sale of food cooked or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises, after issuance of such license, amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food. For the purposes of this subdivision, other designated areas shall include outdoor dining areas, whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises, which outdoor dining areas may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare, provided such areas are under the control of the licensee and approved by the Board. Such noncontiguous designated areas shall not be approved for any retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

.If the restaurant is located on the premises of a hotel or motel with not less than four permanent bedrooms where food and beverage service is customarily provided by the restaurant in designated areas, bedrooms and other private rooms of such hotel or motel, such licensee may (a) sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in such designated areas, bedrooms and other private rooms or off-premises consumption and (b) sell spirits packaged in original closed containers purchased from the Board for on-premises consumption to registered guests and at scheduled functions of such hotel or motel only in such bedrooms or private rooms. However, with regard to a hotel classified as a resort complex, the Board may authorize the sale and on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages in all areas within the resort complex deemed appropriate by the Board. Nothing herein shall prohibit any person from keeping and consuming his own lawfully acquired spirits in bedrooms or private rooms.If the restaurant is located on the premises of and operated by a private, nonprofit or profit club exclusively for its members and their guests, or members of another private, nonprofit or profit club in another city with which it has an agreement for reciprocal dining privileges, such license shall also authorize the licensees to (a) sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises or off-premises consumption and (b) sell spirits that are packaged in original closed containers with a maximum capacity of two fluid ounces or 50 milliliters and purchased from the Board for on-premises consumption. Where such club prepares no food in its restaurant but purchases its food requirements from a restaurant licensed by the Board and located on another portion of the premises of the same hotel or motel building, this fact shall not prohibit the granting of a license by the Board to such club qualifying in all other respects. The club’s gross receipts from the sale of nonalcoholic beverages consumed on the premises and food resold to its members and guests and consumed on the premises shall amount to at least 45 percent of its gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food. The food sales made by a restaurant to such a club shall be excluded in any consideration of the qualifications of such restaurant for a license from the Board.If the restaurant is located on the premises of and operated by a municipal golf course, the Board shall recognize the seasonal nature of the business and waive any applicable monthly food sales requirements for those months when weather conditions may reduce patronage of the golf course, provided that prepared food, including meals, is available to patrons during the same months. The gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises, after the issuance of such license, shall amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food on an annualized basis.If the restaurant is located on the premises of and operated by a culinary lodging resort, such license shall authorize the licensee to (1) sell alcoholic beverages, without regard to the amount of gross receipts from the sale of food prepared and consumed on the premises, for off-premises consumption or for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board and other designated areas of the resort, including outdoor areas under the control of the licensee, and (2) permit the possession and consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages by persons to whom overnight lodging is being provided in bedrooms and private guest rooms.

Mixed beverage caterer’s licenses, which may be granted only to a person regularly engaged in the business of providing food and beverages to others for service at private gatherings or at special events, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption. The annual gross receipts from the sale of food cooked and prepared for service and nonalcoholic beverages served at gatherings and events referred to in this subdivision shall amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food.

Mixed beverage limited caterer’s licenses, which may be granted only to a person regularly engaged in the business of providing food and beverages to others for service at private gatherings or at special events, not to exceed 12 gatherings or events per year, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption. The annual gross receipts from the sale of food cooked and prepared for service and nonalcoholic beverages served at gatherings and events referred to in this subdivision shall amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food.

Mixed beverage special events licenses, to a duly organized nonprofit corporation or association in charge of a special event, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board on the premises of the place designated in the license. A separate license shall be required for each day of each special event.

Annual mixed beverage special events licenses to (i) a duly organized nonprofit corporation or association operating either a performing arts facility or an art education and exhibition facility; (ii) a nonprofit corporation or association chartered by Congress for the preservation of sites, buildings, and objects significant in American history and culture; (iii) persons operating an agricultural event and entertainment park or similar facility that has a minimum of 50,000 square feet of indoor exhibit space and equine and other livestock show areas, which includes barns, pavilions, or other structures equipped with roofs, exterior walls, and open or closed-door access; or (iv) a locality for special events conducted on the premises of a museum for historic interpretation that is owned and operated by the locality. The operation in all cases shall be upon premises owned by such licensee or occupied under a bona fide lease the original term of which was for more than one year’s duration. Such license shall authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages during scheduled events and performances for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by train, boat or airplane, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier, and in designated rooms of establishments of air carriers at airports in the Commonwealth. For purposes of supplying its airplanes, as well as any airplanes of a licensed express carrier flying under the same brand, an air carrier licensee may appoint an authorized representative to load distilled spirits onto the same airplanes and to transport and store distilled spirits at or in close proximity to the airport where the distilled spirits will be delivered onto airplanes of the air carrier and any such licensed express carrier. The air carrier licensee shall (i) designate for purposes of its license all locations where the inventory of distilled spirits may be stored and from which the distilled spirits will be delivered onto airplanes of the air carrier and any such licensed express carrier and (ii) maintain records of all distilled spirits to be transported, stored, and delivered by its authorized representative.

Mixed beverage club events licenses, which shall authorize a club holding a beer or wine and beer club license to sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption by club members and their guests in areas approved by the Board on the club premises. A separate license shall be required for each day of each club event. No more than 12 such licenses shall be granted to a club in any calendar year.

Annual mixed beverage amphitheater licenses to persons operating food concessions at any outdoor performing arts amphitheater, arena or similar facility that has seating for more than 20,000 persons and is located in Prince William County or the City of Virginia Beach. Such license shall authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages during the performance of any event, in paper, plastic or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, to patrons within all seating areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption.

Annual mixed beverage amphitheater licenses to persons operating food concessions at any outdoor performing arts amphitheater, arena or similar facility that has seating for more than 5,000 persons and is located in the City of Alexandria or the City of Portsmouth. Such license shall authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages during the performance of any event, in paper, plastic or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, to patrons within all seating areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption.

Annual mixed beverage motor sports facility license to persons operating food concessions at any outdoor motor sports road racing club facility, of which the track surface is 3.27 miles in length, on 1,200 acres of rural property bordering the Dan River, which shall authorize the licensee to sell mixed beverages, in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, during scheduled events, as well as events or performances immediately subsequent thereto, to patrons in all dining facilities, seating areas, viewing areas, walkways, concession areas or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license.

Annual mixed beverage banquet licenses to duly organized private nonprofit fraternal, patriotic or charitable membership organizations that are exempt from state and federal taxation and in charge of banquets conducted exclusively for its members and their guests, which shall authorize the licensee to serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board on the premises of the place designated in the license. Such license shall authorize the licensee to conduct no more than 12 banquets per calendar year.

Limited mixed beverage restaurant licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve dessert wines as defined by Board regulation and no more than six varieties of liqueurs, which liqueurs shall be combined with coffee or other nonalcoholic beverages, for on-premises consumption in dining areas of the restaurant or off-premises consumption. Such license may be granted only to persons who operate a restaurant and in no event shall the sale of such wine or liqueur-based drinks, together with the sale of any other alcoholic beverages, exceed 10 percent of the total annual gross sales of all food and alcoholic beverages.

Annual mixed beverage motor sports facility licenses to persons operating concessions at an outdoor motor sports facility that hosts a NASCAR national touring race, which shall authorize the licensee to sell mixed beverages, in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, during scheduled events, as well as events or performances immediately subsequent thereto, to patrons in all dining facilities, seating areas, viewing areas, walkways, concession areas or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license to corporations or associations operating a performing arts facility, provided the performing arts facility (i) is owned by a governmental entity; (ii) is occupied by a for-profit entity under a bona fide lease, the original term of which was for more than one year’s duration; and (iii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license to persons operating food concessions at any performing arts facility located in the City of Norfolk or the City of Richmond, provided that the performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than five years; (ii) has a capacity in excess of 1,400 patrons; (iii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards; and (iv) has monthly gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises that meet or exceed the monthly minimum established by Board regulations for mixed beverage restaurants. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license to persons operating food concessions at any performing arts facility located in the City of Waynesboro, provided that the performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than five years; (ii) has a total capacity in excess of 550 patrons; and (iii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or private or special events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license to persons operating food concessions at any performing arts facility located in the arts and cultural district of the City of Harrisonburg, provided that the performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than five years; (ii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards; (iii) has monthly gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises that meet or exceed the monthly minimum established by Board regulations for mixed beverage restaurants; and (iv) has a total capacity in excess of 900 patrons. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or private or special events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

A combined mixed beverage restaurant and caterer’s license, which may be granted to any restaurant, culinary lodging resort, or hotel that meets the qualifications for both a mixed beverage restaurant pursuant to subdivision A 1 and mixed beverage caterer pursuant to subdivision A 2 for the same business location, and which license shall authorize the licensee to operate as both a mixed beverage restaurant and mixed beverage caterer at the same business premises designated in the license, with a common alcoholic beverage inventory for purposes of the restaurant and catering operations. Such licensee shall meet the separate food qualifications established for the mixed beverage restaurant license pursuant to subdivision A 1 and mixed beverage caterer’s license pursuant to subdivision A 2.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license to persons operating food concessions at any multipurpose theater located in the historical district of the Town of Bridgewater, provided that the theater (i) is owned and operated by a governmental entity and (ii) has a total capacity in excess of 100 patrons. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license to persons operating food concessions at any corporate and performing arts facility located in Fairfax County, provided that the corporate and performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease, management, or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than one year and (ii) has a total capacity in excess of 1,400 patrons. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

The granting of any license under subdivision A 1, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, or 20 shall automatically include a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption. The licensee shall pay the state and local taxes required by §§

4.1-231

and

4.1-233

.

History.

Former §

4.1-210

, relating to mixed beverages licenses, was derived from Acts 1968, c. 7, §§ 4-98.2, 4-98.3; 1970, cc. 119, 627; 1972, cc. 679, 691; 1974, c. 460; 1975, c. 483; 1976, cc. 700, 768; 1978, c. 153; 1980, c. 490; 1981, c. 269; 1982, c. 119; 1986, cc. 70, 374; 1987, c. 107; 1990, c. 402; 1991, c. 690; 1992, cc. 162, 215; 1993, cc. 190, 866, 910; 1998, c. 535; 2000, cc. 1036, 1047, 1051; 2001, cc. 461, 845; 2004, c. 487; 2006, c. 731; 2007, cc. 107, 126, 295, 813; 2008, c. 172; 2009, c. 322; 2012, cc. 203, 237; 2013, c. 479; 2014, cc. 125, 231, 495, 633, 638; 2015, cc. 404, 412; 2016, cc. 20, 28, 536; 2017, cc. 76, 153, 158, 585; 2018, c. 179; 2019, c. 174; 2020, cc. 15, 32, 400, 1009; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281, 282.

Editor’s note.

Acts
1993, cc. 190 and
910 amended former § 4-98.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
1993 amendments by cc. 190 and 910 have been given effect in this section as set out above. In accordance with c. 190, the present next-to-last sentence of the second paragraph of subdivision A 1 was added. In accordance with c. 910, “four permanent bedrooms” was substituted for “forty permanent bedrooms” in the second paragraph of subdivision A 1.

Acts
2001, cc. 88 and
96 repealed Acts
2000, cc. 1036 and
1051, cl. 2, which had provided that the provisions of cc. 1036 and 1051 would expire on July 1, 2002. Therefore, these 2000 amendments will not expire.

Acts
2008, c. 172, cl. 2 provides: “That the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, effective January 1, 2022, repealed various sections in this chapter and recodified them. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the amendments by Acts
2020, cc. 15,
32,
400 and
1009 have also been given effect in
§

4.1-206.3

, effective January 1, 2022.

Acts
2020, cc. 15 and
32, cl. 2 provides: “That if
§

4.1-210

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, is repealed by an act of assembly passed by the 2020 Session of the General Assembly and such act reorganizes the licenses set forth in the former §

4.1-210

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, by relocating such licenses in various sections of the Code of Virginia, the annual mixed beverage performing arts facility license created by this act shall remain in effect and shall be relocated in the subdivision of the Code of Virginia in which other annual mixed beverage performing arts facility licenses are relocated.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, cl. 2, as amended by Acts 2022, cc. 78 and 79, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

The 1998 amendment

added subdivision A 6; and in subsection B, deleted “and” following “subdivisions 1” and inserted “subdivisions 1, 5 and 6.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 1036 and 1051 are virtually identical, and added subdivision A 8, and inserted reference to the new subdivision in subsection B. For expiration of this amendment, see Editor’s note.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1047 added subdivision A 7, and inserted reference to the new subdivision in subsection B.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 461 added subdivision A 9, and substituted “7, 8, or 9” for “7, or 8” in subsection B. The amendment by c. 845, effective April 5, 2001, also made the same changes as c. 461.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 487 added subdivision A 10; in the first sentence of subsection B, deleted “or” preceding “9” and inserted “or 10”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 731, in subdivision A 1, in the first paragraph, deleted “on the premises” following “designated areas” and added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 107 added subdivision A 3; redesignated former subdivisions A 3 through A 10 as present subdivisions A 4 through A 11; and substituted “subdivision 1, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, or 11” for “subdivision 1, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, or 10” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2007 amendment by c. 126 inserted “which outdoor dining areas may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare” in the last sentence of the first paragraph in subdivision A 1.

The 2007 amendment by c. 295 added subdivision A 11 [now subdivision A 12].

The 2007 amendment by c. 813, substituted “Prince William County or the City of Virginia Beach” for “any county with a population between 210,000 and 216,000 or in any city with a population between 392,000 and 394,000” in subdivision A 7 [now subdivision A 8]; substituted “the City of Alexandria or the City of Portsmouth” for “any city with a population between 103,900 and 104,500” in subdivision A 8 [now subdivision A 9].

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 172 inserted “dessert wines as defined by Board regulation and” in the first sentence and “wine or” in the second sentence of subdivision A 12.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 322, in subdivision A 5, added clause (iii) and made a related change, and in the second sentence, substituted “all cases” for “either case.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 203 and 237 are identical, and added subdivision A 13; and substituted “subdivision 1, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, or 13” for “subdivision 1, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, or 11” in subsection B.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 479 added subdivision A 14, inserted “14” to the list of subdivisions in subsection B, and made a related change.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 125, in subdivision A 6, added the last two sentences.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 231 and 638 are identical, and in subdivision A 5 substituted “persons operating an agricultural” for “a duly organized nonprofit corporation that has been granted an exemption from federal taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the U.S. Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that owns any rural,” “50,000” for “60,000,” and inserted “which includes barns, pavilions, or other structures equipped with roofs, exterior walls, and open or closed-door access” in clause (iii), and in the last sentence, substituted “licensee to sell” for “sale, on the dates of performance or events in furtherance of the purposes of the nonprofit corporation or association, of,” and inserted “during scheduled events and performances,” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2014 amendment by c. 495, in clause (i) of subdivision A 5, inserted “either” and “or an art education and exhibition facility.”

The 2014 amendment by c. 633, in subdivision A 12, inserted “together with the sale of any other alcoholic beverages” and “of all food and alcoholic beverages” in the last sentence; and in subsection, B inserted “A” and “12.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 404 added subdivision A 15 and substituted “14, or 15” for “or 14” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendment by c. 412 in subdivision A 1, substituted “subdivision” for “paragraph” preceding “other designated areas” in the third sentence and added the fourth sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 20 and 536 are identical, and added subdivision A 15; inserted “or 16” in subsection B; and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment by c. 28, added subdivision A 16; inserted “or 17” in subsection B; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 76 and 153 are identical, and inserted “or in single original metal cans” in subdivisions A 8 through A 10 and A 13.

The 2017 amendment by c. 158 inserted subdivision A 17 and redesignated former subdivision A 17 as subdivision A 18; and substituted “17, or 18” for “or 17” in subsection B.

The 2017 amendment by c. 585 added the last paragraph in subdivision A 1.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 179 inserted clause (iv) in subdivision A 5; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 174 added subdivision A 19, and inserted “or 19” in subsection B.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 15 and 32 are identical, and added subdivision A 20; and in subdivision B, substituted “19, or 20” for “or 19” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendment by c. 400, in the third paragraph of subdivision A 1, in the first sentence, inserted the (a) designation and added clause (b).

The 2020 amendment by c. 1009 added the last paragraph in subdivision A 1.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 281 and 282, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and in the first sentence of the first and second paragraphs of subdivisions A 1 and 12, inserted “on premises” and “or off-premises consumption”; in clause (a) of the third paragraph of subdivision A 1, inserted “or off-premises”; in clause (1) of the fifth paragraph of subdivision A 1, deleted “for on-premises consumption” following “sell alcoholic beverages” and inserted “for off-premises consumption or for on-premises consumption.” For expiration date, see Editor’s note.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Aviation, § 1; 3B M.J. Carriers, § 117; 15 M.J. Public Service and State Corporation Commissions, §§ 17, 21.

§ 4.1-211.
Temporary licenses.

Notwithstanding subsection D of §

4.1-203

, the Board may grant a temporary license to any of the licensed retail operations authorized by §

4.1-206.3

. A temporary license may be granted only after an application has been filed in accordance with the provisions of §

4.1-230

and in cases where the sole objection to granting a license is that the establishment will not be qualified in terms of the sale of food. If a temporary license is not granted, the applicant is entitled to a hearing on the issue of qualifications. The decision to refuse to grant a temporary license shall not be subject to a hearing.

If a temporary license is granted, the Board shall conduct an audit of the business after a reasonable period of operation not to exceed 180 days. If the audit indicates that the business is qualified, the license applied for may be granted. If the audit indicates that the business is not qualified, the applicant is entitled to a hearing. No further temporary license shall be granted to the applicant or to any other person at that location for a period of one year from expiration and, once the application becomes the subject of a hearing, no temporary license may be granted.

A temporary license may be revoked summarily by the Board for any cause set forth in §

4.1-225

without complying with subsection A of §

4.1-227

. Revocation of a temporary license shall be effective upon service of the order of revocation upon the licensee or upon the expiration of three business days after the order of the revocation has been mailed to the licensee at either his residence or the address given for the business in the license application. No further notice shall be required.

History.

Code 1950, § 4-34; 1972, c. 178; 1974, c. 460; 1980, c. 524; 1984, c. 180; 1993, c. 866; 2020, cc. 1113, 1114.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 3, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 82, cls. 2 and 3, provides: “That the provisions of the first, second, and fourth enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022, except for the provisions of the first enactment that amend the definition of low alcohol beverage cooler set forth in
§

4.1-100

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, which shall become effective July 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1113 and
1114, cl. 6 provides: “That the Board of Directors of the Virginia Alcoholic Beverage Control Authority may promulgate regulations that allow a licensee who holds a license that is repealed by the provisions of this act to continue to operate under such license until the expiration of its original term.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1113 and 1114 are identical, effective January 1, 2022, and in the first paragraph, substituted “§

4.1-206.3

” for “§§

4.1-206

through

4.1-210

” in the first sentence and made a stylistic change.